en: Citrus fruit teas
de: Zitrus-Tees
fr: Infusions aux agrumes, Infusions agrumes, Infusion agrumes, Infusion aux agrumes
hr: Čajevi od agruma
hu: Citrusteák
it: Tisane agli agrumi, Infusi agli agrumi
lt: Citrusinių vaisių arbatos
nl: Citrusvruchtentheeën, Citrusvruchtenthee

en: Red fruit teas
de: Rote Früchtetees
fr: Infusions aux fruits rouges, Infusion aux fruits rouges
hr: Čajevi od crvenog voća
it: Tisane ai frutti rossi, Infusi ai frutti rossi
nl: Rode vruchtentheeën, Rode vruchtenthee

en: Herbal fruit teas in tea bags
da: Frugtteer i pose
es: infusiones con frutas en bolsitas
fi: Hedelmäyrttiteepussit
fr: Infusions aux fruits en sachets
hr: Biljni voćni čajevi u vrećicama
it: Tisane alla frutta in bustina, Infusi alla frutta in bustina
lt: Raudonųjų vaisių arbatos
sv: Fruktteer i pås

en: Ginkgo
xx: Ginkgo
de: Ginkgo
es: Ginkgo
fr: Ginkgo
hr: Ginkgo
hu: Ginkgo, Gkgo biloba
ja: イチョウ
la: Ginkgo biloba
nl: Ginkgo
pl: Miłorząb japoński, Ginkgo biloba
ro: Ginkgo biloba

en: Herbal tea blends
da: Urteteblandinger
de: Kräuterteemischungen
es: Mezclas de plantas para infusiones
fi: yrttiteesekoitukset
fr: Tisanes de plantes mélangées
hr: Mješavine biljnih čajeva
hu: Gyógynövénytea keverékek
it: Miscele per tisane
ja: ブレンドハーブティ, ブレンドハーブティー
lt: Žolelių arbatos mišiniai
nl: Gemengde Kruidentheeën, Gemengde Kruidenthee

en: Good nightrest tea blends
de: Gute Nacht Tee, Gute-Nacht-Tee
fi: Iltateet
fr: Infusions Bonne Nuit, Infusions douce nuit, Infusions nuit calme
hr: Čajne mješavine za laku noć
it: Tisane della buonanotte, Infusi della buonanotte
lt: Labos nakties arbatos mišiniai
nl: Goede nachtrusttheeën, Goede nachtrustthee

en: Weight-loss tea blends
de: Abnehm-Tee
fr: Infusions minceur, Tisanes minceur, Infusion minceur, Tisane minceur
hr: Čajne mješavine za mršavljenje
hu: Fogyókúrás teakeverékek
it: Miscele per tisane snellenti, Miscele per tisane dimagranti
lt: Svorį mažinantys arbatos mišiniai
nl: Afslank thee melanges, Afslank thee melange

en: Weight-loss Teas
fr: Thés minceur, Thé minceur
hr: Čajevi za mršavljenje
hu: Fogyókúrás teák
it: Tè dimagranti, Tè snellenti, The dimagranti, The snellenti
nl: Afslank theeën, Afslank thee

en: Verbena Peppermint
de: Verbene-Pfefferminz
fr: Verveine menthe, Verveines menthe
hr: Verbena paprena metvica
it: Verbena menta
nl: Verveine pepermunt

en: Hibiscus
de: Hibiskus
es: Hibisco
fr: Hibiscus
hr: Hibiskus
hu: Hibiszkusz
it: Ibisco
ja: フヨウ属, ハイビスカス
la: Hibiscus
nl: Hibiscus
pl: Hibiskus

en: Roselle
es: Rosa de Jamaica
fr: Oseille de Guinée, Roselle
hr: Rozela
ja: ローゼル
la: Hibiscus sabdariffa
nl: Roelle

en: Honeybush
de: Honigbusch
es: Honeybush
fr: Honeybush
hr: Medonosni grm
ja: ハニーブッシュ
la: Cyclopia
nl: Honeybush

en: Juniper berry teas
da: Enebærsteer
nb: Einebærteer, Einerbærteer
nn: Einebærtear, Einerbærtear
sv: Enbärsteer

en: Lavender
bg: Лавандула
de: Lavendel
es: Espliego
fr: Lavande officinale
hr: Lavanda
hu: Levendula
ja: ラベンダー
la: Lavandula spica, Lavandula angustifolia
lt: Levanda
nl: Lavendel
pl: Lawenda
ro: Levănțică, Lavandă

en: Lemon balm
de: Zitronenmelisse
es: Melisa, Toronjil
fr: Mélisse officinale, Mélisse citronnelle
hr: Matičnjak
ja: レモンバーム
la: Melissa officinalis
lt: Melisa
nl: Citroenmelisse
pl: Melisa

en: Limeflower tea, Lime trees, Linden
de: Lindenblüten
es: Tila
fr: Tilleul
hr: Čaj od lipe
la: Tilia
lt: Liepų arbata, Liepa, Liepų
nl: Linde
pl: Lipa

en: Large-leaved lime, Large-leaved linden
de: Sommerlinde
es: Tila de hoja ancha
fr: Tilleul à grandes feuilles
hr: Krupnolisna lipa
la: Tilia platyphyllos
nl: Zomerlinde

en: Small-leaved lime, Small-leaved linden
de: Winterlinde
es: Tila de hoja pequeña
fr: Tilleul à petites feuilles
hr: Sitnolisna lipa
la: Tilia cordata
nl: Winterlinde

en: Liquorice herbal teas, Liquorice teas, licorice herbal teas, licorice teas
fr: Infusions de réglisse
hr: Biljni čajevi od sladića
ja: スペインカンゾウ
lt: Saldymedžio žolelių arbatos, saldymedžio arbatos

en: Mallow, Common mallow
de: Malve
es: Malva, Malva común
fr: Grande mauve, Mauve sylvestre, Mauve des bois
hr: Sljez
hu: Mályva
ja: ウスベニアオイ, ブルーマロウ
la: Malva sylvestris
nl: Groot kaasjeskruid, Kaasjeskruid
pl: Ślaz dziki, Malwa dzika